Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 4. State Facilities for Youthful Offenders.

§ 53.1-63.
Department to establish facilities for persons committed under Article 2 (§ 19.2-311 et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2

The Department shall establish, staff and maintain, at any state correctional facility designated by the Director, programs and housing for the rehabilitation, training and confinement of persons committed to the Department under the provisions of Article 2 (§

19.2-311

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2. Persons admitted to these facilities shall be determined by the Department to have the potential for rehabilitation through confinement and treatment therein.

Elements of the program shall include but not be limited to (i) an initial period of military style drill, (ii) cognitive behavioral restructuring designed to teach responsibility and accountability through anger management, life skills development, substance abuse education, parenting skills development and peer tutoring, (iii) developmental counseling as needed, (iv) academic education, career and technical education, and apprenticeships, and (v) transitional release, reentry services, aftercare and intensive parole supervision.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.1; 1966, c. 482; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636; 1990, c. 701; 2000, cc. 668, 690; 2001, c. 483; 2020, c. 759.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 668, cl. 2 and c. 690, cl. 3, provide: “That the Department of Corrections shall report annually to the General Assembly on or before December 1 on the utilization of the Youthful Offender Program by the Judiciary.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 688 and 690 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical education” for “and vocational training” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board” in subsection A in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 53.1-63.1.
Department to establish facilities for juveniles sentenced as adults.

The Department shall establish, staff and maintain, at any state correctional facilities designated by the Director, programs and housing for the rehabilitation, training, and confinement of juveniles sentenced by the circuit courts as adults and committed to the Department pursuant to § 16.1-272. The Department shall establish, staff, and maintain education for such juveniles in accordance with standards established by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

History.

1996, cc. 755, 914; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, c. 759.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 755 and 914, cls. 7, provide: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply to offenses committed and to records created and proceedings held with respect to those offenses on or after July 1, 1996.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “The Department of Correctional Education shall establish, staff, and maintain education for such juveniles in accordance with Chapter 18 (§ 22.1-339 et seq.) of Title 22.1.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director” for “Board” in the first sentence.

§ 53.1-64.
Programs and facilities.

The Department shall establish and maintain within each facility programs for counseling and education, including career and technical education; buildings sufficient to ensure the secure confinement of persons admitted to the facility; and programs in at least one such facility for the study, testing and diagnosis of the following persons:

Persons committed to the Department for diagnosis and evaluation under the provisions of §

19.2-316

for a determination as to the likelihood of their benefitting from the program of such facility; and

Persons confined in the state corrections system under the indeterminate period of commitment authorized by Article 2 (§

19.2-311

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2, to evaluate their progress periodically and to determine their readiness for release.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.2; 1966, c. 482; 1982, c. 636; 1990, c. 701; 2001, c. 483.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “and education, including career and technical education” for “education and vocational training” in the introductory language; and inserted “Article 2 (§

19.2-311

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2” in subdivision 2.

§ 53.1-65.
Consideration of report developed at diagnostic facilities.

The Department shall give careful consideration to the report developed at the diagnostic facilities established under §

53.1-64

in determining whether persons committed to it under the provisions of §

19.2-311

et seq., are to be confined at a youthful offender facility or elsewhere in the state corrections system.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.3; 1966, c. 482; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-66.
Transfer of prisoners to other facilities.

Any person confined by the Department in a facility established by this chapter may be transferred from such facility to other facilities in the state corrections system for the remainder of the period of commitment under § 16.1-272 or Article 2 (§

19.2-311

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2, upon a written finding by the Department submitted to the sentencing court that the person has exhibited intractable behavior or, in the case of persons committed under §

19.2-311

, otherwise becomes ineligible to use such facilities pursuant to § 19.2-311.

“Intractable behavior” means behavior which (i) indicates an inmate’s unwillingness or inability to conform his behavior to that necessary to his successful completion of the program or (ii) is so disruptive as to threaten the successful completion of the program by other participants.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.4; 1966, c. 482; 1982, c. 636; 1990, c. 701; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 755 and 914, cls. 7, provide: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply to offenses committed and to records created and proceedings held with respect to those offenses on or after July 1, 1996.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “§ 16.1-272 or Article 2” following “the period of commitment under,” inserted “of Chapter 18 of Title 19.2” following “(§

19.2-311

et seq.)” and inserted “in the case of persons committed under §

19.2-311

” following “the person has exhibited intractable behavior or.”

§ 53.1-67.
Admission to facility; good conduct allowance restricted.

In no case shall a person previously confined in a youthful offender facility, whether for a different or the same offense, be confined again in such a facility, except for the purposes of study, testing and diagnosis.

The provisions of §§

53.1-191

,

53.1-196

, and

53.1-198

through

53.1-201

relating to good conduct credits and allowances and extraordinary service and the provisions of §

53.1-187

relating to credit for time served in a correctional facility or juvenile detention facility shall not apply to persons sentenced to an indeterminate sentence under §

19.2-311

for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1983.
Acts performed by such persons which would earn credit for them under §

53.1-191

, if it were applicable, shall be noted on their record by the authorities of the facility.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-128.5; 1966, c. 482; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 606; 1984, c. 313; 1990, c. 701.